Maine, session 132, LD1227.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1810, sub-§2, as enacted by IB 2023, c. 3, §3, is amended to
read:
2. Independent entity. The Attorney General shall designate an independent entity
not controlled by one or more motor vehicle manufacturers to establish and administer
access to vehicle-generated data that is available through the on-board diagnostic system
or that is transmitted by the standardized access platform authorized under this section. The
independent entity must consist of one representative each from a cross section of industry
trade groups including but not limited to organizations representing motor vehicle
manufacturers, aftermarket parts manufacturers, aftermarket parts distributors and retailers,
independent motor vehicle service providers and new car dealers. The independent entity
shall manage cyber-secure access to motor vehicle-generated data, including ensuring on
an ongoing basis that access to the on-board diagnostic system and standardized access
platform is secure based on all applicable United States and international standards. The
independent entity shall:
A. Identify and adopt relevant standards for implementation of this section and
relevant provisions for accreditation and certification of organizations and for a system
for monitoring policy compliance;
B. Monitor and develop policies for the evolving use and availability of data generated
by the operations of motor vehicles; and
C. Create policies for compliance with relevant laws, regulations, standards,
technologies and best practices related to access to motor vehicle data.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1810, sub-§6, as enacted by IB 2023, c. 3, §3, is repealed.